District of Columbia statutes.
38-908

Bond not required for supplies issued by Department of the Army.

On and after July 1, 1943, a bond shall not be required on account of military supplies or equipment issued by the Department of the Army for military instruction and practice by the students of high schools in the District of Columbia.

July 15, 1939, 53 Stat. 1015, ch. 281, § 1
June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 317, ch. 333, § 1
July 1, 1943, ch. 184, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-2208.
1973 Ed., § 31-1115.